Alabama, session 2026rs, HB388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-9-39.41 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§40-9-39.41
(a) All of the following community foundation entities
are exempted from paying any state sales and use taxes:
(1) The Black Belt Community Foundation.
(2) The Central Alabama Community Foundation.
(3) The Community Foundation of Greater Birmingham.
(4) The Community Foundation of Greater Decatur.
(5) The Community Foundation of Greater Huntsville.
(6) The Community Foundation of Northeast Alabama.
(7) The Community Foundation of South Alabama.
(8) The Community Foundation of West Alabama.
(9) The Limestone Area Community Foundation.
(10) The Walker Area Community Foundation.
(b) Each entity listed in subsection (a) shall file an
annual informational report in a manner as prescribed by the
Department of Revenue. The information on such reports shall
Page 1

Department of Revenue. The information on such reports shall
HB388 Enrolled
be consistent with the information required by the Department
of Revenue pursuant to Section 40-9-61 and rules adopted
thereunder. Information provided pursuant to this section is
exempted from the confidentiality provisions of Section
40-2A-10, and shall be provided by the Department of Revenue
to the Legislative Services Agency, Fiscal Division, on an
annual basis.
(c) The sales and use tax exemption authorized under
this section shall be effective September 1, 2026, and shall
continue through August 31, 2031.
(d) Any county or municipality may exempt the entities
listed in subsection (a) from county or municipal sales and
use taxes in accordance with Section 40-23-4.01.
Section 2. Section 40-9-39.4, Code of Alabama 1975,
relating to the existing sales and use tax exemptions for the
entities in Section 1(a), is repealed.
Section 3. Section 1 of this act shall become effective
immediately. Section 2 of this act shall become effective
January 1, 2027.
Page 2

January 1, 2027.
HB388 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 03-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3